Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.040

Violations of chapter.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) It is a violation of this chapter for a vehicle dealer, as defined in *RCW 46.70.011(3), to engage in the unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in motor vehicles.

(2) It is a violation of this chapter for a person to engage in the unlawful subleasing of motor vehicles.

[1990 c 44 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 46.70.011 was amended by 2006 c 364 s 1, changing subsection (3) to subsection (4). RCW 46.70.011 was subsequently alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (4) to subsection (17), effective July 1, 2011.